es: Método de uso del cortador colgante: Colgante/clip para bolso; Llavero; Cordón; Collar/colgante con cordón; Para llevar en el bolsillo (sin enganche); Carrete retráctil para emblema; Otro
vi: Phương pháp mài mòn của máy cắt mặt dây chuyền: Đồ trang trí/móc kẹp túi; Móc khóa; Dây đeo cổ; Vòng cổ/mặt dây chuyền; Mang trong túi (không kèm phụ kiện); Cuộn huy hiệu có thể rút lại; Khác
ko: 펜던트 커터 착용 방법: 가방 참/클립; 키체인; 랜야드; 목걸이/코드 펜던트; 주머니 휴대(부착물 없음); 수납식 배지 릴; 기타
lt-LT: Pakabuko pjaustytuvo nešiojimo būdas: Krepšio pakabukas / segtukas; Raktų pakabukas; Dirželis ant kaklo; Kaklo papuošalas / pakabukas ant virvelės; Nešiojimas kišenėje (be tvirtinimo); Įtraukiama ženklelio ritė; Kita
el: Μέθοδος φθοράς κοπτικού μενταγιόν: Διακοσμητικό/κλιπ τσάντας; Μπρελόκ; Κορδόνι λαιμού; Κολιέ/μενταγιόν με κορδόνι; Μεταφορά στην τσέπη (χωρίς εξάρτημα); Μηχανισμός με αναδιπλούμενο κορδόνι (γιογιό); Άλλο
fi: Turvavyöleikkurin kantamistapa: Laukkukoru/klipsi; Avaimenperä; Kaulanauha; Kaulakoru/riipus; Taskussa kannettava (ei kiinnitystä); Sisäänvedettävä tunnistekela; Muu
de: Trageart des Anhängerschneiders: Taschenanhänger/Clip; Schlüsselanhänger; Lanyard; Halskette/Kordelanhänger; In der Tasche (ohne Befestigung); Ausziehbares Jojo; Sonstige
da: Bæremetode for vedhængssaks: Taskevedhæng/-klips; Nøglering; Lanyard; Halskæde/snorvedhæng; Lomme (ingen fastgørelse); Badge-yoyo; Andet
zh-CN: 吊坠切割器佩戴方式: 包袋挂饰/夹扣; 钥匙扣; 挂绳; 项链/挂绳吊坠; 口袋携带（无附件）; 可伸缩易拉扣; 其他
sl-SI: Način nošenja rezalnika v obliki obeska: Obesek/sponka za torbo; Obesek za ključe; Trak za okoli vratu; Ogrlica/obesek na vrvici; Nošenje v žepu (brez pritrditve); Zložljivo držalo za priponke; Drugo
th: วิธีการสึกหรอของหัวตัดจี้: ของตกแต่งกระเป๋า/คลิป; พวงกุญแจ; สายคล้อง; สร้อยคอ/จี้ห้อยคอ; พกใส่กระเป๋า (ไม่มีที่ติด); ตลับสายคล้องบัตรแบบดึงกลับได้; อื่นๆ
sv: Bärmetod för hängsmyckesskärare: Väsksmycke/klämma; Nyckelring; Nyckelband; Halsband/snöre med hänge; I fickan (utan fäste); Jojo för passerkort; Övrigt
ja: ペンダントカッターの着用方法: バッグチャーム/クリップ; キーチェーン; ランヤード; ネックレス/コードペンダント; ポケットキャリー（アタッチメントなし）; 収納式バッジリール; その他
hr-HR: Metoda trošenja rezača privjeska: Privjesak za torbu / kopča; Privjesak za ključeve; Vrpca za nošenje oko vrata; Ogrlica / privjesak na vrpci; Nošenje u džepu (bez dodataka); Uvlačivi držač za značku; Ostalo
hu: Fonalvágó medál: Táskadísz / klip; Kulcstartó; Nyakpánt; Nyaklánc / zsinór medál; Zsebben hordható (rögzítés nélkül); Visszahúzható jelvénytartó; Egyéb
pl: Sposób noszenia nożyka-wisiorka: Ozdoba do torby / z klipsem; Brelok; Smycz; Naszyjnik / zawieszka na sznurku; Noszenie w kieszeni (bez mocowania); Zwijana rolka na identyfikator; Inne
bg-BG: Метод на носене на висулка-резец: Украшение за чанта/клипс; Ключодържател; Връзка за врат; Колие/висулка с шнур; Носене в джоб (без прикрепване); Прибираща се макара за значка; Друг
zh-TW: 吊墜式切割器配戴方式: 包包吊飾/夾扣; 鑰匙圈; 掛繩; 項鍊/掛繩墜飾; 口袋攜帶 (無配件); 伸縮識別證夾; 其他
tr: Kolye tipi kesicinin takılma yöntemi: Çanta süsü/klipsi; Anahtarlık; Boyun askısı; Kolye/ipli kolye ucu; Cep taşıması (eklenti yok); Makaralı rozet askısı; Diğer
ro-RO: Metoda de utilizare a tăietorului de pandantive: Breloc/clemă pentru geantă; Breloc pentru chei; Șnur; Colier/pandantiv cu șnur; Purtare în buzunar (fără prindere); Rolă retractabilă pentru ecuson; Altele
sk-SK: Metóda merania opotrebenia závesnej rezačky: Ozdoba na tašku/spona; Kľúčenka; Šnúrka na krk; Náhrdelník/prívesok na šnúrke; Nosenie vo vrecku (bez upevnenia); Navíjací držiak na odznak; Iné
nb: Slitasjemetode for anhengskjærer: Veskeanheng/klips; Nøkkelring; Nøkkelbånd; Halskjede / anheng med snor; Til å ha i lommen (uten feste); Inntrekkbar kortholdersnelle; Annet
en: Pendant cutter wear method: Bag charm/clip; Keychain; Lanyard; Necklace/cord pendant; Pocket carry (no attachment); Retractable badge reel; Other
fr: Mode de port du coupe-fil pendentif: Breloque/clip de sac; Porte-clés; Cordon; Collier/pendentif sur cordon; Transport en poche (sans attache); Enrouleur de badge rétractable; Autre
pt-BR: Cortador pingente método de uso: Pingente de bolsa/clipe; Chaveiro; Cordão; Colar/pingente de cordão; De bolso (sem fixação); Porta-crachá retrátil; Outro
cs: Metoda opotřebení frézy na přívěsky: Přívěsek / klip na tašku; Klíčenka; Šňůrka na krk; Náhrdelník / přívěsek na šňůrce; Do kapsy (bez uchycení); Navíjecí klíčenka na průkaz; Ostatní
ru: Способ ношения подвесного резака: Брелок для сумки / зажим; Брелок для ключей; Ланьярд; Кулон на шнурке; В кармане (без крепления); Выдвижной брелок-ретрактор; Другое
pt-PT: método de desgaste do cortador de pingente: Berloque/clipe para saco; Porta-chaves; Fita de pescoço; Colar/pingente de cordão; Transporte no bolso (sem acessório); Carretel retrátil para crachá; Outro
nl: Hanger snijder draagmethode: Tashanger/clip; Sleutelhanger; Keycord; Ketting/koordhanger; Los in de zak (geen bevestiging); Intrekbare badgerol; Overig
it: Metodo di utilizzo del tagliafilo a ciondolo: Ciondolo per borsa/clip; Portachiavi; Cordino; Collana/ciondolo con cordoncino; Da tasca (nessun attacco); Bobina per badge retrattile; Altro